Utah statutes.
54-7-4.   Copies, competent evidence.
Copies of any official documents or orders filed or deposited according to law
in the office of the commission, certified by a commissioner or by the
secretary or the assistant secretary under the official seal of the commission
to be true copies of the originals, shall be evidence in the same manner as
the originals.
